Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 3. Reservoirs

Cross references. —

As to public works and contracts, see §

16-6-101

et seq.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

For article, “Dam Safety: The Critical Imperative,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 341 (1979).

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Necessity and sufficiency of environmental impact statements under § 102(2)(C) of National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 USC § 4332(2)(C)) in cases involving water and waterworks projects, 67 ALR Fed 54.

§ 41-3-301.
Application for reservoir construction permit; contents; procedure.

Any person, corporation, association, or organization, of any nature whatsoever, hereafter intending to store or impound, for beneficial uses, any of the unappropriated waters of the state of Wyoming, shall, before commencing construction of any works for such purpose, or performing any work in connection with said proposed construction, make an application to the state engineer, for a permit to construct a reservoir. The application must set forth the name and post office address of the applicant; the source of the water supply; the nature of the proposed use; the location and description of the proposed work; the time within which it is proposed to begin construction, and the time required for the completion of construction. Maps and plans shall conform with the provisions of W.S.

41-4-510

. In case of reservoirs where the storage is for stock purposes only and the capacity does not exceed twenty (20) acre-feet and the height of dam does not exceed twenty (20) feet, the state engineer may issue a permit without the filing of a map; however the state engineer may require certain information be submitted on special forms to be furnished or designated by him. Any violation of subsection (a) of this section shall be punishable pursuant to W.S.

41-3-616

with the exception that the owner of any unpermitted reservoir with a capacity of twenty (20) acre-feet or less and a dam height of twenty (20) feet or less shall have forty-five (45) days after receipt of the written notice of violation pursuant to W.S.

41-3-616

(a), to submit an application for a permit. The application shall meet the requirements of the state engineer’s office. Each day of the forty-five (45) days shall not be counted as a separate violation if the application for a reservoir permit is received during this forty-five (45) day period.

For reservoir permits issued in conjunction with the national pollutant discharge elimination system (NPDES) for mining operations, the state engineer shall promptly review the application and advise the applicant in writing if it is complete, within thirty (30) days. If the application is complete, or is resubmitted to the satisfaction of the state engineer, it shall be approved or denied within forty-five (45) days of this determination:

For the purpose of this subsection “complete” means that the application contains all the essential and necessary elements and is acceptable for further review for substance and compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 69, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 743; C.S. 1920, § 864; R.S. 1931, § 122-1502; Laws 1941, ch. 24, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-601; W.S. 1957, § 41-26; Laws 1980, ch. 67, § 1; 2005, ch. 15, § 2; ch. 82, § 2.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 15, § 2, effective July 1, 2005, in (a), in the final sentence (now fourth-to-last) deleted “on tracing cloth” following “filing of a map” and inserted “or designated.”

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, added the last three sentences in (a).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Editor's notes. —

There is no paragraph (b)(ii) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Water may, in this state, be impounded in reservoir

by one who is neither the owner nor in possession of any land. The owner of such reservoir may sell, lease, transfer and use such water in such manner and upon such lands as the owner may desire (§

41-3-323

). It is the policy in this state, however, along with that of all the arid regions, that its waters should be put to the highest possible use, and one should be able to get control of any part of it for mere future speculative profit or advantage. Kearney Lake, Land & Reservoir Co. v. Lake DeSmet Reservoir Co., 475 P.2d 548,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1970).

Reservoir owner can make storage of quantity of water

within the limitation of its rights to water as recognized by the board. Kearney Lake, Land & Reservoir Co. v. Lake DeSmet Reservoir Co., 475 P.2d 548,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1970).

A reservoir corporation does not have the right to store more water than can be or is beneficially used. Kearney Lake, Land & Reservoir Co. v. Lake DeSmet Reservoir Co., 475 P.2d 548,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1970).

Reservoir rights are subject to abandonment.

Kearney Lake, Land & Reservoir Co. v. Lake DeSmet Reservoir Co., 475 P.2d 548,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1970).

Municipal use. —

City, prior appropriator for municipal use before date of distinction between right of appropriation for water directly from stream and appropriation from reservoirs, was authorized to impound waters appropriated for use in emergency as against claim of subsequent appropriator that water was not used for beneficial purpose. Van Tassel Real Estate & Livestock Co. v. Cheyenne, 49 Wyo. 333, 54 P.2d 906,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 299 U.S. 574, 57 S. Ct. 38, 81 L. Ed. 423, 1936 U.S. LEXIS 282 (U.S. 1936).

Stated

in

State ex rel. Christopulos v. Husky Oil Co., 575 P.2d 262,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 268

(Wyo. 1978); John Meier & Son v. Horse Creek Conservation Dist., 603 P.2d 1283,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 492

(Wyo. 1979).

Cited

in

Laughlin v. State Bd. of Control, 21 Wyo. 99, 128 P. 517,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1912); State ex rel. Leazenby v. True, 26 Wyo. 314, 184 P. 229,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1919).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Record Title of Water and Ditch Rights,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 200.

For article, “Priority and Progress — Case Studies in the Transfer of Water Rights,” see I Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1966).

For article, “Transfer of Water Rights — Errata and Addenda — Sales for Recreational Purposes and to Districts,” see II Land & Water L. Rev. 321 (1967).

For comment, “Improvement of Existing Water Rights Through Unification — A Case Study on the Consolidation of Appropriations,” see II Land & Water L. Rev. 327 (1967).

For comment, “The Nature of a Reservoir Right,” see III Land & Water L. Rev. 443 (1968).

For comment, “Procedural Considerations in the Judicial Determination of Water Disputes,” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 513 (1974).

§ 41-3-302.
Application for construction permit; conditions; secondary permit; certificate of appropriation.

All applications under this article shall be subject to the provisions of W.S.

41-4-502

through

41-4-510

,

41-4-517

and

41-3-615

, which set forth the duties and authority of the state engineer and provide for the protection of the rights of applicants; provided that an enumeration of any lands proposed to be irrigated under this article shall not be required in the primary permit, provided, further, that any party or parties desiring to appropriate such stored water to particular lands may file with the state engineer an application for permit to be known herein as the secondary permit, in compliance with the provisions of W.S.

41-4-501

through

41-4-510

and

41-4-517

. In the event secondary permit may be desired, said application shall refer to such reservoir for a supply of water and the state engineer shall not approve of said application and issue secondary permit until the applicant thereunder shall show to such state engineer by documentary evidence that he has entered into an agreement with the owners of the reservoir for a permanent and sufficient interest in said reservoir to impound enough water for the purposes set forth in said application. When beneficial use has been completed and perfected under the said secondary permit the division superintendent shall take the proof of the water user under such permit and the final certificate of appropriations shall refer to both the ditch described in the secondary permit and the reservoir described in the primary permit.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 69, § 2; 1907, ch. 86, § 16; C.S. 1910, § 744; C.S. 1920, § 863; R.S. 1931, § 122-1501; Laws 1939, ch. 59, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-602; W.S. 1957, § 41-27.

Basic right to store reservoir water for irrigation purposes

depends upon provisions for use of the water by the holders of primary permits, by the holders of secondary permits, and by the owners of other lands lying under and capable of being irrigated from the reservoir, in the order named. The constitution, statutes and decisions, fairly interpreted, mean that any rights to use such water in the state are based upon priority and beneficial use and are relevant to the rights of all interested parties. Lake De Smet Reservoir Co. v. Kaufmann, 75 Wyo. 87, 292 P.2d 482,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1956).

Primary and secondary permits. —

This section is the only statute relative to reservoirs in which is found reference to “primary” and “secondary” permits. The primary permit contemplates the authority from the state to construct a reservoir, while a secondary permit is the state's authority to appropriate the impounded waters in a reservoir to beneficial use. Condict v. Ryan, 79 Wyo. 211, 333 P.2d 684,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1958).

Time of filing. —

Where plaintiff's original application for permission for a reservoir was filed under this section, and the engineer returned it for additional information, a second application with the additional information being subsequently filed, the two applications are to be taken as one and applicant given all the benefit of his priority under the first filing. Laughlin v. State Bd. of Control, 21 Wyo. 99, 128 P. 517,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1912).

Description of land not required. —

Statute does not require permits for reservoirs and storage water to incorporate description of lands to be irrigated. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

Substitution possible. —

Under administrative law concerning storage water, irrigable acreage may be substituted for nonirrigable acreage included in original reservoir project. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

Rights in surplus water. —

If reservoir has sufficient capacity above that required to satisfy contractual rights of owners of land in original project, reservoir owner has right to contract with others for use of storage water. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

Contract whereby owner of reservoir agreed to furnish storage water for irrigation of lands not in original project was, under circumstances of the case, valid as to purchasers of land included in original project. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

Municipal use. —

City, prior appropriator for municipal use before date of distinction between right of appropriation for water directly from stream and appropriation from reservoirs, was authorized to impound waters appropriated for use in emergency as against claim of subsequent appropriator that water was not used for beneficial purpose. Van Tassel Real Estate & Livestock Co. v. Cheyenne, 49 Wyo. 333, 54 P.2d 906,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 299 U.S. 574, 57 S. Ct. 38, 81 L. Ed. 423, 1936 U.S. LEXIS 282 (U.S. 1936).

Principles of laches, estoppel and limitation of action were available

as defenses to claim that contract whereby water right owner acquired authority to construct reservoir in consideration for furnishing storage water to irrigate land not regularly included in project was invalid. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

Jurisdiction of supreme court. —

Under art. 5, §§ 2, 3, Wyo. Const., the supreme court has no original jurisdiction to issue writ of prohibition against state engineer to restrain him from holding threatened hearing seeking to cancel a permit to construct a reservoir, the state engineer not being an “inferior court” within the constitution. State ex rel. Leazenby v. True, 26 Wyo. 314, 184 P. 229,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1919).

Cited

in

In re Gen. Adjudication of All Rights, 2004 WY 21, 85 P.3d 981,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(2004).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Record Title of Water and Ditch Rights,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 200.

§ 41-3-303.
Use of stored water.

The use of water stored under the provisions of this chapter may be acquired under such terms as shall be agreed upon by and between the parties in interest. Lands entitled to the use of water in any reservoir may use the water stored therein, and to which they are entitled, at such times and in such amounts as the water users may elect, provided that a beneficial use of water is made at all times.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 69, § 7; 1905, ch. 14, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 749; C.S. 1920, § 870; Laws 1921, ch. 140, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 122-1508; C.S. 1945, § 71-608; W.S. 1957, § 41-28.

Description of land not required. —

Statute does not require permits for reservoirs and storage water to incorporate description of lands to be irrigated. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

Substitution possible. —

Under administrative law concerning storage water, irrigable acreage may be substituted for nonirrigable acreage included in original reservoir project. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

Rights in surplus water. —

If reservoir has sufficient capacity above that required to satisfy contractual rights of owners of land in original project, reservoir owner has right to contract with others for use of storage water. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

Contract whereby owner of reservoir agreed to furnish storage water for irrigation of lands not in original project was, under circumstances of the case, valid as to purchasers of land included in original project. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

Reservoir rights were properly conveyed. —

Summary judgment was properly awarded to defendants in assignees'
action challenging the validity of an easement where the fact that reservoir rights were permitted for irrigation did not impact the ownership of the rights conveyed by the Wyoming State Board of Land Commissioners to the Wyoming Game and Fish Commission.
Bentley v. Office of State Lands, 2007 WY 94, 160 P.3d 1109,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(June 8, 2007).

Principles of laches, estoppel and limitation of action were available as defenses

to claim that contract whereby water right owner acquired authority to construct reservoir in consideration for furnishing storage water to irrigate land not regularly included in project was invalid. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

Stated

in

Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Dodge, 387 P.2d 679,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1963).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Leazenby v. True, 26 Wyo. 314, 184 P. 229,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1919); Nebraska v. Wyoming, 325 U.S. 589, 65 S. Ct. 1332, 66 S. Ct. 1, 89 L. Ed. 1815, 1945 U.S. LEXIS 2620 (1945).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Determining Quantity in Irrigation Appropriations,” see IV Land & Water L. Rev. 501 (1969).

§ 41-3-304.
Use of bed of stream.

Whenever the owner, manager or lessee of a reservoir, constructed under the provisions of this act [§§

41-3-301

through

41-3-304

,

41-3-318

,

41-3-319

and

41-3-321

], shall desire the use of the bed of the stream, or other water course, for the purpose of carrying stored or impounded water from the reservoir to the consumer, or shall desire the use of any ditch to carry, convey or transmit any of the stored or impounded water for the benefit of any person having the right to have the reservoir water carried, conveyed or transmitted through the ditch under the laws of this state, he shall, in writing notify the water commissioner of the district in which the stored or impounded water is to be used, giving the date when it is proposed to discharge water from the reservoir, its volume in acre feet and the names of all persons and ditches entitled to its use, and other matters as may be necessary to properly distribute the water. It shall then be the duty of the water commissioner to so adjust the headgates of all ditches of ditch companies or appropriators from the stream or water course, and the division boxes of individual consumers of water, not entitled to the use of the stored water, as will enable those having the right to secure the volume of water to which they are entitled. The commissioner shall not in any other manner interfere with the headgates or division boxes, except as otherwise provided by law. The water commissioner shall keep a true and just account of the time spent by him in the discharge of his duties as defined in this section, and it shall be the duty of the water commissioner or division superintendent to present a bill of one-half (1/2) the expense so incurred to the reservoir owner, manager or lessee, and if the owner, manager, or lessee shall neglect for three (3) days, after the presentation of the bills of costs, to pay the costs, the costs shall be made a charge upon the reservoir and shall be collected as delinquent taxes until the complete payment of the bill of costs has been made. Costs recovered under this section shall be paid into the general fund.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 69, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 745; Laws 1913, ch. 104, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 866; R.S. 1931, § 122-1504; C.S. 1945, § 71-604; W.S. 1957, § 41-29; Laws 1991, ch. 157, § 1.

Cited

in

State ex rel. Leazenby v. True, 26 Wyo. 314, 184 P. 229,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1919); Nebraska v. Wyoming, 325 U.S. 589, 65 S. Ct. 1332, 66 S. Ct. 1, 89 L. Ed. 1815, 1945 U.S. LEXIS 2620 (1945).

§ 41-3-305.
Direct flow storage.

The holder or owner of an adjudicated water right to the direct use of the natural unstored flow of any surface stream of the state may store such direct flow so long as no other Wyoming appropriator or user is injured or affected thereby. Prior to the commencement of the storage of water under a direct flow water right, the appropriator shall submit a request for such storage in writing to the state engineer and shall obtain the approval of the state board of control. The state board of control may permit storage at any time so long as there is no interference with existing water rights or uses. The state engineer is authorized and empowered to prescribe such rules and regulations as may be necessary or desirable to enable him to effectively administer the provisions of this section.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 203, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-29.1; Laws 1975, ch. 177, § 2.

Section inapplicable to water treatment holdings. —

This section should not apply to the temporary holding of effluent waters for water treatment purposes, especially when all of those waters are imported. Thayer v. Rawlins, 594 P.2d 951,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 407

(Wyo. 1979).

Stated

in

State ex rel. Christopulos v. Husky Oil Co., 575 P.2d 262,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 268

(Wyo. 1978).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Importation Doctrine Applied to Water Transfers Within a River System: A Step Too Far,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 99 (1980).

§ 41-3-306.
Instream stock use.

In the administration of water rights on any stream and in the consideration of any applications for permits, the state engineer may require that water be provided to meet reasonable demands for instream stock use.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-30.

§ 41-3-307.
Alterations or repairs of dams or diversion systems; definitions.

As used in this act unless the context otherwise requires:

“Alterations” or “repairs” means only such alterations or repairs as may directly affect the safety of the dam or diversion system, as determined by the state engineer or his designated representative;

“Appurtenant works” include, but are not limited to, such structures as spillways, either in the dam or separate therefrom, the reservoir and its rim, low level outlet works, and water conduits such as tunnels, pipelines or penstocks, either through the dam or its abutments;

“Dam” means any artificial barrier, including appurtenant works, used to impound or divert water and which is or will be greater than twenty (20) feet in height or with an impounding capacity of fifty (50) acre-feet or greater. “Dam” shall not include artificial barriers including appurtenant works:

Six (6) feet in height or less, regardless of storage capacity; or

Which impound less than fifteen (15) acre-feet, regardless of height.

“Days” used in establishing deadlines means calendar days, including Sundays and holidays;

“Diversion system” means any channel diversion, headgate or diversion structure with a carrying capacity in excess of fifty (50) cubic feet of water per second of time;

“Emergency” means any threat to life or property caused by the condition of any dam, reservoir or diversion system, or by present or imminent floods which threaten the safety or structural integrity of any dam or diversion system;

“Emergency response agency” means any agency which the dam owner may be required to notify in case of an emergency, such as sheriff’s office, highway patrol or local emergency coordinator;

“Enlargement” means any change in or addition to an existing dam or reservoir which raises or may raise the water storage elevation of the water impounded by the dam;

“Inspection” means visual or mechanical checks, measures, borings and any other methods necessary for determination of the adequacy of construction techniques, conformity of work with approved plans and specifications, and the safety and operating performance of a dam or diversion system and appurtenant works;

“Owner” includes any of the following who own, control, operate, maintain, manage or propose to construct a dam or reservoir:

The state and its departments, institutions, agencies and political subdivisions;

Every municipal or quasi-municipal corporation;

Every public utility;

Every district;

Every person;

The federal government and its departments, institutions, agencies and political subdivisions;

The duly authorized agents, lessees or trustees of any of the foregoing; and

Receivers or trustees appointed by any court for any of the foregoing.

“Person” means any person, firm, association, organization, partnership, business trust, corporation or company;

“Reservoir” means any basin which contains or will contain impounded water;

“This act” means W.S.

41-3-307

through

41-3-317

.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 120, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-30.1; Laws 1992, ch. 23, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Quoted

in

Tillery v. West Side Canal, Inc., 719 P.2d 1384,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 562

(Wyo. 1986).

§ 41-3-308.
Alterations or repairs of dams or diversion systems; plans and specifications; duties of state engineer.

Plans and specifications of any proposed construction, enlargement, major repair, alteration or removal of a dam or diversion system shall be prepared by or under the direction of a registered professional engineer licensed to practice in the state of Wyoming and experienced in dam design and construction, and shall be submitted to the state engineer for approval. It is unlawful to commence construction, enlargement, major repair, alteration or removal until the plans and specifications have been approved by the state engineer. At the request of the state engineer, the professional engineer responsible for the plans and specifications shall carry out any revisions of the plans and specifications or provide such additional information as is necessary to justify or clarify the design.

A copy of all plans and specifications submitted under this section shall be kept on file in the state engineer’s office.

In the event that a proposed dam or diversion system is related to a facility which requires an industrial siting permit pursuant to W.S.

35-12-106

:

The plans and specifications of the proposed dam or diversion system shall be submitted to the state engineer at the same time that the application for an industrial siting permit is submitted to the industrial siting administration [industrial siting council] pursuant to W.S.

35-12-108

;

The state engineer shall approve or reject the plans and specifications of the proposed dam or diversion system prior to the public hearing conducted pursuant to W.S. 35-12-110(f)(i);

The approval or rejection of the plans and specifications of the proposed dam or diversion system shall be binding on the industrial siting council for the purposes of issuing an industrial siting permit.

The state engineer shall provide for the regulation and supervision of all dams, diversion systems and reservoirs by the state to the extent required to protect the public safety and property. The state engineer is authorized and directed to promulgate regulations and standards for the design, construction, enlargement, alteration, abandonment, maintenance, monitoring, operation, repair and removal of dams, reservoirs, and diversion systems as are necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of this act. The state engineer may waive any or all of the requirements of this act in instances where the dam or diversion system is located in a remote area where there is no threat to the public safety or property.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 120, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-30.2; Laws 1992, ch. 23, § 1.

Industrial siting administration. —

Section

35-12-108

, referred to in subsection (c)(i), relates to submitting a permit to the industrial siting council, not the industrial siting administration.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the last two sentences in subsection (d), see § 41-3-307(a)(xiii).

§ 41-3-309.
Alterations or repairs of dams or diversion systems; inspections performed and reports submitted to state engineer by professional engineer.

A registered professional engineer licensed to practice in the state of Wyoming shall be in charge of and responsible for the construction, enlargement, major repair, alteration or removal of any dam or diversion system.

The engineer in charge shall provide for inspections at such intervals as deemed necessary to insure conformity with the approved plans and specifications, either by himself or by a person qualified to perform the inspections and for whose work the engineer stands personally responsible.

All information obtained from, during or as the result of such inspection shall be made part of a report, certified to by the engineer in charge, which shall be submitted to the state engineer at such time or times as may be set by the state engineer.

All reports submitted under this section shall be filed in the state engineer’s office.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 120, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-30.3; Laws 1992, ch. 23, § 1.

§ 41-3-310.
Alterations or repairs of dams or diversion systems; inspections by state engineer or assistant engineer; cost.

If the state engineer believes that inspections carried out under W.S.

41-3-309

are inadequate or that additional inspections are necessary, the state engineer may inspect personally or appoint an assistant engineer to inspect the construction, enlargement, repair, alteration or removal of any dam or diversion system. If after any inspection the state engineer or his representative finds that amendments, modifications or changes are necessary in order to insure the security and integrity of the work and structure, the protection of property or the public safety, the state engineer may order the owner or owners of the dam or diversion system to revise the plans and specifications, or order work stopped. It is unlawful to proceed with or continue the work until any revisions have been approved by the state engineer.

Any inspections required by this section shall be made at state expense, provided the assistant engineer performing such inspections is an employee of the state of Wyoming.

If the assistant engineer is not a regular employee of the state of Wyoming, inspections shall be made at the expense of the owner. The owner shall be furnished with an estimate of the cost prior to performance of any inspections, but the state engineer is not precluded from collecting any or all additional costs which result from performance of the inspections. Costs to be paid by the owner shall include, but are not limited to, all work or tests as are necessary to fully provide any information and data required by the state engineer or his appointed representative. If the owner refuses or neglects to turn over the funds within thirty (30) days, after the presentation of the bill of costs, the costs shall constitute a lien upon the works or other properties of the owner or owners and may be collected by appropriate action in any court of competent jurisdiction. In order to have a valid, enforceable lien under this section, a lien statement sworn to before a notarial officer shall be filed by the claimant with the county clerk of the county in which the property is located. The county clerk shall file the statement and index by date, name of claimant and property owner, and by legal description. The lien statement shall contain the following:

The name and address of the governing body seeking to enforce the lien;

The name and address of the person against whose property the lien is filed; and

The legal description of the property to which the lien attaches.

All funds paid by the owner to the state engineer shall be deposited in the state engineer’s holding account from which account the costs incurred as a result of any inspections or other work deemed necessary under this section shall be paid. Any funds not so expended shall be returned to the person or persons advancing the funds.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 120, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-30.4; Laws 1992, ch. 23, § 1; 2008, ch. 20, § 2.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “notarial officer” for “notary public” in the fifth sentence of the introductory language of (c).

§ 41-3-311.
Alterations or repairs of dams or diversion systems; periodic inspections.

Any dam subject to the terms of this act shall be inspected at least once every ten (10) years or as often as deemed necessary based on the hazards of the dam to insure the continued protection of public safety and property.

Inspections referred to in subsection (a) of this section shall be performed by the state engineer or his appointed representative who shall have right of entry upon private or government lands and is authorized to inspect the owner’s technical data and other documentation as may be necessary to perform these inspections. All information obtained as a result of the inspections shall be filed in the state engineer’s office.

Inspections required under this section shall be made at state expense except as provided in W.S.

41-3-312

when a dam, reservoir or diversion system is found to be unsafe by the state engineer.

If inspections performed under this section disclose defects in the works which in the judgment of the state engineer or his authorized agent constitute a threat to life or property, the state engineer may, without incurring any liability, order the draining of any reservoir involved, or the limitation or cessation of its use or the use of any defective works until such time as the owner of the reservoir or other works returns the works to a safe condition as approved by the state engineer.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 120, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-30.5; Laws 1992, ch. 23, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a), see § 41-3-307(a)(xiii).

§ 41-3-312.
Alterations or repairs of dams or diversion systems; inspections at other than regular times; cost; unsafe structures.

The state engineer may, or upon written request from any person or persons residing on or owning land near any dam, reservoir or diversion system shall, order an inspection of those works at any time other than the time set for regular inspections as provided for in W.S. 41-3-311(a). Before ordering an inspection, the state engineer may require any person or persons requesting the inspection to deposit a sum of money sufficient to pay the expenses of the inspection into the state engineer’s holding account. If after the inspection the dam, reservoir or diversion system is determined to be in a safe and usable condition, the state engineer may cause the whole or part of the expenses of the inspection to be paid out of the state engineer’s holding account. Any excess funds shall be returned to the person or persons advancing the funds.

If the dam, reservoir or diversion system is found to be defective, any funds deposited by the person or persons requesting the inspection shall be returned and the state engineer may require the person or persons owning the dam, reservoir or diversion system in question to pay the whole or any part of the expenses of inspection. If the state engineer requires a payment, he shall present a bill of costs to the owner or owners, and if the owner or owners refuse or neglect to pay the costs within thirty (30) days after the presentation of the bill of costs, the costs shall constitute a lien upon the works or other properties of the owner or owners and may be collected by appropriate action in any court of competent jurisdiction. If the inspection discloses defects in the works which in the judgment of the state engineer or his authorized agent constitute a threat to life or property, the state engineer may, without incurring any liability, order the draining of any reservoir involved, or the limitation or cessation of its use or the use of any defective works until such time as the owner of the reservoir or other works returns the works to a safe condition as approved by the state engineer. The lien shall be filed as provided by W.S. 41-3-310(c).

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 120, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-30.6; Laws 1992, ch. 23, § 1.

§ 41-3-313.
Alterations or repairs of dams or diversion systems; outlets; maintenance; draining by breaching.

All dams and reservoirs hereafter constructed, with or without a controlled inlet, shall contain an outlet controlled by a headgate or other control works. The headgate or control works shall be maintained in an operable condition at all times and in a manner that water impounded by or within a dam or reservoir may be evacuated or maintained at any water level which may be required by the state engineer.

All dams constructed prior to the effective date of this act which have no outlet or means for lowering the reservoir water level in an expeditious manner, may be drained by breaching at the owner’s expense when the public safety so requires.

The state engineer and anyone working under his direction and control shall not be held liable for any damages or loss of water resulting from the draining or imposed restrictions as to the use of a reservoir, dam or diversion system.

If within thirty (30) days after presentation of an itemized statement the owner fails to reimburse the state engineer for expenses incurred under this section, any unpaid balance of such expense shall automatically constitute a lien upon lands or other properties of the owner.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 120, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-30.7; Laws 1992, ch. 23, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1977, ch. 120, § 4, makes the act effective on May 27, 1977.

Cited

in

Dechert v. Christopulos, 604 P.2d 1039,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 223

(Wyo. 1980).

§ 41-3-314.
Alterations or repairs of dams or diversion systems; emergency repairs or breaching.

In case of an emergency where the state engineer or his authorized representative declares that repairs or breaching of a dam or diversion system are immediately necessary to safeguard life and property, the necessary repairs or breaching shall be started immediately by the owner or by the state engineer or his representative at the owner’s expense, if the owner fails to do so. The state engineer and emergency response agencies shall be notified at once of any changes in the physical conditions of the dam, diversion system, or reservoir which significantly increase the probability of failure of the dam or diversion works or the danger to life or property, proposed emergency repairs or breaching to be instituted by the owner. These reporting requirements shall apply only to cases in which an emergency has been declared pursuant to this subsection.

If emergency repairs have been made and the emergency situation has passed, the owner shall commence all repairs necessary to return the dam or diversion system to a safe and usable condition, as provided in W.S.

41-3-308

through

41-3-310

.

All costs incurred by the state engineer during an emergency shall be payable by the owner or owners on receipt of the bill of costs from the state engineer. Costs not paid within thirty (30) days after presentation of the bill shall constitute a lien upon the dam or diversion system or other properties of the owner or owners and may be collected by appropriate action in any court of competent jurisdiction. The lien shall be filed as provided by W.S. 41-3-310(c).

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 120, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-30.8; Laws 1992, ch. 23, § 1.

§ 41-3-315.
Alterations or repairs of dams or diversion systems; enforcement of provisions.

For any reservoir the state engineer may enforce any sections of this act in such manner and by such means as may be necessary to insure the safety of the public and protection of property.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 120, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-30.9; Laws 1992, ch. 23, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 41-3-307(a)(xiii).